Hawaii, session 2025, HB310.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that drug overdose deaths in the United States have more than doubled since 1999.  According to the most recent data from the federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, in 2022, more than eighty-two thousand deaths involving opioids were reported.  In Hawaii, there has been an increase in drug overdose deaths and emergency department visits associated with the recent influx of synthetic opioid products. Opioids also pose a growing risk to the safety and well-being of students and school communities. The legislature further finds that opioid antagonists, including naloxone, are used to reverse the effects of opioids.  The easy access to, and rapid administration of, an opioid antagonist may be lifesaving for individuals experiencing an overdose due to opioid use, especially in the school setting where emergency services may not be near the immediate area and educators who can be trained in the use of opioid antagonists are readily available. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to: (1)  Require all public schools, including public charter schools, to maintain a stock supply of opioid antagonists; and (2)  Require the department of education and state public charter school commission to offer training to school employees on the administration of opioid antagonists. SECTION 2.  Chapter 302A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding two new sections to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§302A-A  Opioid antagonist; stock supply; administration. (a)  Each department school shall maintain a stock supply of opioid antagonists, including at least two doses of four milligrams of intranasal naloxone, to be administered by an authorized employee.  Each school that maintains a stock supply of opioid antagonists in a school setting or at related activities shall: (1)  Follow the department's protocol related to the training of the department's employees, the maintenance and location of the opioid antagonists, and immediate and long-term follow up to the administration of the medication, including making a 911 emergency call; (2)  Only allow authorized employees who have completed appropriate training to administer the stock opioid antagonist; (3)  Store stock opioid antagonists in a secure, easily accessible, and unlocked location known to all public school staff designated to administer the opioid antagonist; (4)  Ensure that the department's protocols authorize employees to administer, in good faith, the opioid antagonist to any student or individual who is experiencing a potential life-threatening opioid-related drug overdose; (5)  Inform parents and guardians about the potential use of an opioid antagonist in an emergency; and (6)  Make the protocol available upon request. (b)  Any authorized employee of the department who administers an opioid antagonist pursuant to this section shall receive the same immunity as provided to a health care professional pursuant to section 329E-2. (c)  For the purposes of this section: "Authorized employee" means an employee who received training pursuant to section 302A-B and who volunteers to administer an opioid antagonist to any student or individual as needed for actual or perceived opioid-related drug overdose. "Opioid antagonist" shall have the same meaning as in section 329E-1. "Opioid-related drug overdose" shall have the same meaning as in section 329E-1. §302A-B  Opioid antagonist; employees; training.  (a) The department shall offer training on the use of opioid antagonists in response to an opioid-related drug overdose to employees of department schools.  The training shall include, at a minimum: (1)  Background information on opioids and the overdose epidemic; (2)  Signs of opioid misuse and overdose; (3)  Response procedures including the need to immediately call 911; (4)  Proper use of naloxone, if available; (5)  Practice of hands-only cardiopulmonary resuscitation and the use of an automated external defibrillator; and (6)  Related state and federal laws. (b)  For the purposes of this section: "Opioid antagonist" shall have the same meaning as in section 329E-1. "Opioid-related drug overdose" shall have the same meaning as in section 329E-1." SECTION 3.  Chapter 302D, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding two new sections to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§302D-A  Opioid antagonist; stock supply; administration. (a)  Each charter school shall maintain a stock supply of opioid antagonists, including at least two doses of four milligrams of intranasal naloxone, to be administered by an authorized employee.  Each charter school that maintains a stock supply of opioid antagonists in a school setting or at related activities shall: (1)  Follow the commission's protocol related to the training of employees, the maintenance and location of the opioid antagonists, and immediate and long-term follow up to the administration of the medication, including making a 911 emergency call; (2)  Only allow authorized employees who have completed appropriate training, to administer the stock opioid antagonist; (3)  Store stock opioid antagonists in a secure, easily accessible, and unlocked location known to all public school staff designated to administer the opioid antagonist; (4)  Ensure that the department's protocols authorize employees to administer, in good faith, the opioid antagonist to any student or individual who is experiencing a potential life-threatening opioid-related drug overdose; (5)  Inform parents and guardians about the potential use of an opioid antagonist in an emergency; and (6)  Make the protocol available upon request. (b)  Any authorized employee of a charter school who administers an opioid antagonist pursuant to this section shall receive the same immunity as provided to a health care professional pursuant to section 329E-2. (c)  For the purposes of this section: "Authorized employee" means an employee who received training pursuant to section 302A-B and who volunteers to administer an opioid antagonist to any student or individual as needed for actual or perceived opioid-related drug overdose. "Opioid antagonist" shall have the same meaning as in section 329E-1. "Opioid-related drug overdose" shall have the same meaning as in section 329E-1. §302A-B  Opioid antagonist; employees; training.  (a) The commission shall offer training on the use of opioid antagonists in response to an opioid-related drug overdose to employees of a charter school.  The training shall include, at a minimum: (1)  Background information on opioids and the overdose epidemic; (2)  Signs of opioid misuse and overdose; (3)  Response procedures including the need to immediately call 911; (4)  Proper use of naloxone, if available; (5)  Practice of hands-only cardiopulmonary resuscitation and the use of an automated external defibrillator; and (6)  Related state and federal laws. (b)  For the purposes of this section: "Opioid antagonist" shall have the same meaning as in section 329E-1. "Opioid-related drug overdose" shall have the same meaning as in section 329E-1." SECTION 4.  In codifying the new sections added by sections 2 and 3 of this Act, the revisor of statutes shall substitute appropriate section numbers for the letters used in designating the new sections in this Act. SECTION 5.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 6.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________